FraudulentFur.xfst
# -*- coding: utf-8 -*-

# Faux Fur

# Morphology

################################## DATA #################################

define ROOTS {lat} | {ba} | {mul} ;

############################# BASIC DEFINITIONS #########################

define V [ a | e | i | o | u ] ;
define C [ b | d | f | g | j | %[PalatalJ%] | k | l | m | n | %[Engma%] | %[PalatalN%] | r | s | t | w | y ] ;

define SEGMENTS [ V | C ] ;

define BILABIAL [ b | m | f ] ;
define SONORANT [ V | l ] ;
define NASAL [ m | n | %[Engma%] %[PalatalN%] ] ;

define PERSON [ %+1st | %+2nd | %+3rd] ;
define NUMBER [ %+Sing | %+Pl ] ;
define TENSE [ %+Perfect ] ;

define GENTAGS [ %+DeltaNasal | %+DeltaVoice | %+MetCC | %+MetCV | %+MetVV |
    %+MetWithinMorph | %+MetBetweenMorph ] ;

define TAGS [ PERSON | NUMBER | TENSE ] ;

define BOUNDARY [ %+ | .#. ] ;

############################# MORPHOLOGY ################################

# To do: allow free order in tags
# Do metathesis first
# All persons and numbers except 3Sing
# Tags contain 1st, or 2nd, or 3rd and Pl
define Metathesizes ROOTS [ %+1st NUMBER | %+2nd NUMBER | %+3rd %+Pl ] TENSE;

# Since this is purely for verb roots and conjugation, not making it
# generalized
define Reorder [ l:a a:l ?* | l:e e:l ?* | l:i i:l ?* | l:o o:l ?* |
l:u u:l ?* | m:a a:m ?*  | m:e e:m ?* | m:i i:m ?* | m:o o:m ?* | m:u u:m ?* |
b:a a:b ?*  | b:e e:b ?* | b:i i:b ?* | b:o o:b ?* | b:u u:b ?* |
d:a a:d ?*  | d:e e:d ?* | d:i i:d ?* | d:o o:d ?* | d:u u:d ?* 
] ;

define NoMetathesis ROOTS %+3rd %+Sing TENSE ;

define Personal1 [ [ Metathesizes .o. Reorder ] | NoMetathesis]  ;

# 1st and 3rd Sing have no prefixes and pass through
# Literal + marks morpheme boundary

# Can't use ROOTS here because metathesis has applied
# Add personal prefixes
define PersPrefixes [ 
    SEGMENTS+ [ [ %+1st | %+3rd ] %+Sing ] TENSE |
    0:j 0:%+ SEGMENTS+/%+ [ %+2nd %+Sing ] TENSE |
    0:b 0:%+ SEGMENTS+/%+ [ %+2nd %+Pl ] TENSE |
    0:k 0:%+ SEGMENTS+/%+ [ [ %+1st | %+3rd ] %+Pl ] TENSE
];

# Perfect tense
# 3rd Pl gets a different ending than the rest

define AddTense [
    SEGMENTS+/%+ 0:%+ 0:i %+3rd:0 %+Sing:0 %+Perfect:0 |
    SEGMENTS+/%+ 0:%+ 0:i [ %+1st | %+2nd ]:0 NUMBER:0 %+Perfect:0 |
    SEGMENTS+/%+ 0:%+ 0:i 0:e %+3rd:0 %+Pl:0 %+Perfect:0 
] ;

define Morphology Personal1 .o. PersPrefixes .o. AddTense ;

################################### GEN ##################################

define VoiceCoronal t (->) d %+DeltaVoice ;

define Denasalize n (->) d %+DeltaNasal,
m (->) b %+DeltaNasal,
%[PalatalN%] (->) t j %+DeltaNasal,
%[Engma%] (->) g %+DeltaNasal 
;

define Nasalize d (->) n %+DeltaNasal,
b (->) m %+DeltaNasal,
t j (->) %[PalatalN%] %+DeltaNasal,
g (->) %[Engma%] %+DeltaNasal 
;
